Utah statutes.
41-6a-1631.   Prohibitions.
(1)  A person may not operate on a highway a motor vehicle that is
mechanically altered or changed:
(a)  in any way that may under normal operation:
(i)  cause the motor vehicle body or chassis to come in contact with the
roadway;
(ii)  expose the fuel tank to damage from collision; or
(iii)  cause the wheels to come in contact with the body;
(b) in any manner that may impair the safe operation of the vehicle;
(c)  so that any part of the vehicle other than tires, rims, and mudguards are
less than three inches above the ground;
(d)  to a frame height of more than 24 inches for a motor vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight rating of less than 4,500 pounds;
(e)  to a frame height of more than 26 inches for a motor vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight rating of at least 4,500 pounds and less than 7,500 pounds;
(f)  to a frame height of more than 28 inches for a motor vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight rating of at least 7,500 pounds;
(g)  by stacking or attaching vehicle frames (one from on top of or beneath
another frame); or
(h)  so that the lowest portion of the body floor is raised more than three
inches above the top of the frame.
(2)  If the wheel track is increased beyond the O.E.M. specification, the top
50% of the tires shall be covered by the original fenders, by rubber, or other
flexible fender extenders under any loading condition.
